Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2921
Physical therapy; license; qualifications.

Every applicant for a license to practice physical therapy shall:

(1) Present proof of completion of an approved educational program;

(2) In the case of an applicant who has been trained as a physical therapist in a foreign country, (a) present documentation of completion of a course of professional instruction substantially equivalent to an approved program accredited by the Commission on Accreditation in Physical Therapy Education or by an equivalent accrediting agency as determined by the board and (b) present proof of proficiency in the English language; and

(3) Successfully complete an examination approved by the department, with the recommendation of the board.

Laws 1957, c. 298, § 3, p. 1075;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 140;

Laws 1990, LB 1064, § 16;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 169;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-2803;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 139;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1,383;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1014.

Credentialing, general requirements and issuance procedures, see section 38-121 et seq.